Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202648-443
Safety committee; required; membership; employee rights and remedies.

(1) Every public employer subject to the Nebraska Workers' Compensation Act shall establish a safety committee. Such committee shall adopt and maintain an effective written injury prevention program.

(2)(a) For public employers subject to collective-bargaining agreements, the establishment of the safety committee may be accomplished through the collective-bargaining process.

(b) For public employers not subject to collective-bargaining agreements, the safety committee shall be composed of an equal number of members representing employees and the employer. Employee members shall not be selected by the employer but shall be selected pursuant to procedures prescribed in rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by the Commissioner of Labor.

(c) The cost of maintaining and operating the safety committee shall be minimal to the public employer.

(3) A public employer shall compensate employee members of the safety committee at their regular hourly wage plus their regular benefits while the employees are attending committee meetings or otherwise engaged in committee duties.

(4) An employee shall not be discharged or discriminated against by his or her employer because he or she makes any oral or written complaint to the safety committee or any governmental agency having regulatory responsibility for occupational safety and health, and any employee so discharged or discriminated against shall be reinstated and shall receive reimbursement for lost wages and work benefits caused by the employer's action.

Laws 1993, LB 757, § 32;

Laws 2010, LB579, § 19;

Laws 2026, LB397, § 3.
July 18, 2026
Nebraska Workers' Compensation Act, see section 48-1,110.